Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-809
Waiver of rights; void.

A credit services organization shall not attempt to cause a buyer to waive a right under the Credit Services Organization Act. A purported waiver by a buyer of any part of the act shall be void.

Laws 1991, LB 292, § 9.